Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6022YC (4) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.234, subsections 2, 3, 4, and 5, Code 1 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 321.234B Bicycles, electric personal 3 assistive mobility devices, and pedestrian conveyances. 4 1. A person using a device on a highway is subject to the 5 provisions of this chapter and has all the rights and duties 6 under this chapter applicable to the driver of a vehicle, 7 except those provisions of this chapter which by their nature 8 can have no application and those provisions for which specific 9 exceptions have been set forth regarding police bicycles. 10 However, a person using a device on a highway is not required 11 to register the device, hold a driverâs license, or maintain or 12 carry proof of financial liability coverage for the device. 13 2. A person shall not use a device on a highway other 14 than in a manner that complies with the device manufacturerâs 15 recommended use and, if applicable, upon or astride a permanent 16 and regular seat attached to the device, and shall not carry 17 more persons at one time than the number of persons for which 18 the device is designed and equipped. This subsection does not 19 apply to the use of a device in a parade authorized by a proper 20 permit from a local authority. 21 3. While using a device, a person shall not carry a package, 22 bundle, or article that prevents the person from keeping the 23 personâs hands on the handlebar or other steering mechanism of 24 the device at all times. 25 4. A person using a device shall not hold onto or attach 26 the device to a moving motor vehicle. This subsection does 27 not prohibit a person from attaching a trailer or accessory 28 designed for use with the device to the device. 29 5. A person shall not use a device on a roadway with a speed 30 limit above twenty-five miles per hour. This subsection does 31 not prohibit a person from using a device while in a bicycle 32 lane or when crossing a roadway. 33 6. Except as provided in subsection 7, paragraph âbâ , a 34 device may be used on sidewalks and multi-use trails unless 35 -1- LSB 6022YC (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 6 H.F. _____ the use of a device is prohibited on the sidewalk or trail and 1 notice of the prohibition is posted in a manner to alert users 2 of the sidewalk or trail. A person using a device on a sidewalk 3 or multi-use trail shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians 4 and give an audible signal before overtaking a pedestrian. A 5 person shall not exceed twenty miles per hour when using a 6 device on a sidewalk or multi-use trail. 7 7. If a device is a class 3 low-speed electric bicycle, the 8 following restrictions apply: 9 a. A person shall not ride a class 3 low-speed electric 10 bicycle unless it is equipped with a speedometer that displays 11 its speed in miles per hour. 12 b. A person shall not ride a class 3 low-speed electric 13 bicycle on a sidewalk or multi-use trail. 14 c. A person under the age of sixteen shall not ride a class 15 3 low-speed electric bicycle. This paragraph does not prohibit 16 a person under the age of sixteen from riding as a passenger 17 on a class 3 low-speed electric bicycle in compliance with 18 subsection 2. 19 8. A person shall not use a device that is not equipped with 20 at least one brake that allows the person to make the braked 21 wheel skid on dry, level, clean pavement. 22 9. A violation of this section is a simple misdemeanor. 23 10. As used in this section: 24 a. âDeviceâ includes a bicycle, a low-speed electric 25 bicycle, an electric personal assistive mobility device, and a 26 pedestrian conveyance when used to move the person who is using 27 the pedestrian conveyance. 28 b. âUseâ includes but is not limited to riding a bicycle. 29 Sec. 3. Section 321.235B, subsections 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9, 30 Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 31 Sec. 4. Section 321.236, subsections 10 and 14, Code 2026, 32 are amended to read as follows: 33 10. Regulating the operation riding of bicycles and 34 requiring the registration and licensing of the same, 35 -2- LSB 6022YC (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 6 H.F. _____ including the requirement of a registration fee. However, the 1 regulations shall not conflict with the provisions of section 2 321.234 321.234B . 3 14. Regulating or prohibiting the operation of electric 4 personal assistive mobility devices authorized pursuant to 5 section 321.235A . However, the regulations or prohibitions 6 shall not conflict with the provisions of section 321.234B. 7 Sec. 5. Section 321.397, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 321.397 Lamps on bicycles , devices, and personal conveyances . 10 Every During the times specified in section 321.384, a 11 person shall not ride a bicycle shall be or use an electric 12 personal assistive mobility device or pedestrian conveyance to 13 move the person unless the bicycle, device, or conveyance, as 14 applicable, is equipped with a lamp on the front exhibiting a 15 white light , at the times specified in section 321.384, visible 16 from a distance of at least three hundred feet to the front and 17 with a lamp on the rear exhibiting a red light visible from a 18 distance of three hundred feet to the rear; except that a red 19 reflector may be used in lieu of a rear light. A peace officer 20 riding a police bicycle is not required to use either front or 21 rear lamps if duty so requires. 22 Sec. 6. Section 805.8A, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 23 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 24 Sec. 7. Section 805.8A, subsection 9A, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 9A. Electric device Low-speed electric bicycle 27 violations. For electric device low-speed electric bicycle 28 violations under the following sections section 321.235B , the 29 scheduled fine is as follows: twenty-five dollars. 30 a. Section 321.235A . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25. 31 b. Section 321.235B . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25. 32 Sec. 8. REPEAL. Section 321.235A, Code 2026, is repealed. 33